Washington statutes.
RCW 19.405.110

Relationship to the energy independence act.

The requirements of RCW 19.405.030 through 19.405.090 do not replace or modify the requirements established under chapter 19.285 RCW. All utility activities to comply with the requirements established under chapter 19.285 RCW also qualify for compliance with the requirements contained in this chapter, insofar as those activities meet the requirements of chapter 288, Laws of 2019.

[ 2019 c 288 s 11.]